Utah statutes.
19-8-112.   Denial of certificate of completion -- Appeal.

(1)  If the executive director determines the applicant has not successfully completed a voluntary cleanup in accordance with an agreement entered into under this chapter, the executive director shall:

(a)  notify the applicant and the current owner of the property that is the subject of the agreement of the denial of a certificate of completion; and

(b)  provide to the applicant a list in writing of the reasons for the denial.

(2)  The applicant may appeal the determination of the executive director as provided in Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

